Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2942.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; department of economic security; reimbursement rate increases; rehabilitation group homes; fiscal years 2026-2027, 2027-2028, 2028-2029, 2029-2030 and 2030-2031 The sum of $12,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund and $36,000,000 is appropriated in medicaid expenditure authority in each of fiscal years 2026-2027, 2027-2028, 2028-2029, 2029-2030 and 2030-2031 to the department of economic security for reimbursement rate increases for rehabilitation group homes for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities that use the health care common procedure coding system code T2016.